Tennessee, session 114, SB1866.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-1-109(c), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(4) The person is exempted from the definition of an investment adviser or
investment adviser representative by rule adopted by the commissioner pursuant to §
48-1-102(13)(F) or § 48-1-102(14)(B).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-1-111(d)(4), is amended by
deleting "in this subdivision (d)(4)" and substituting "in subdivision (d)(3)".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-1-119(b), is amended by adding
the following language at the end of the subsection:
Upon request of the commissioner, the chancery court shall appoint the commissioner
as the receiver or the conservator for the defendant or the defendant's assets.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-1-122(h), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting:
(h) A private right of action brought by any person under this section must not be
maintained unless commenced before the expiration of five (5) years after the act or
transaction constituting the violation or the expiration of two (2) years after the discovery
of the facts constituting the violation, or after such discovery should have been made by
the exercise of reasonable diligence, whichever expires first.
SB1866
011707
- 1 -

SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-1-128, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting:
(a) The requirements of subsection (b) apply to the following:
(1) A broker-dealer or an agent with a principal place of business, branch
office, or other business location in this state; or
(2) A broker-dealer or an agent previously registered in this state, with a
principal place of business, branch office, or other business location in this state
at the time during which the underlying customer dispute being sought to be
expunged occurred.
(b) Prior to initiating a proceeding described in subdivision (b)(1)(A) or (b)(1)(B),
a person described in subdivision (a)(1) or (a)(2) must:
(1) Provide the department with written notice at least sixty (60) days
prior to:
(A) Filing to vacate, modify, or confirm an arbitration award
relating to expungement of customer dispute information from the Central
Registration Depository (CRD) system; or
(B) Filing an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to obtain
expungement of customer dispute information from the CRD system; and
(2) Name the department as a party to the proceeding described in
subdivision (b)(1)(A) or (b)(1)(B).
(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b)(2), upon receiving the written notice required
by subdivision (b)(1), the commissioner may, in the commissioner's discretion, waive the
obligation of a person described in subdivision (a)(1) or (a)(2) to name the department
as a party pursuant to a proceeding described in subdivision (b)(1)(A) or (b)(1)(B).
- 2 - 011707

SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 4, Part 1, is amended by
deleting the part.
SECTION 7. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 011707